Washington, session 2025-2026, SB6127.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 50A.05 RCW to read as follows:(1) The state auditor shall conduct a performance audit of program integrity measures in the state paid family and medical leave program. The auditor may contract with an independent expert in state programs that provide benefits to workers.(2) The performance audit must:(a) Evaluate the extent to which the department:(i) Has implemented program integrity measures including, but not limited to, fraud protections, program misuse detection, coverage eligibility verification standards, and enforcement mechanisms to deny fraudulent claims;(ii) Has implemented methods to recover benefit amounts to which the individual is not entitled, including overpayments and benefits obtained through fraudulent practices; and(iii) Provides claim information to employers and employees that supports the ability to determine whether a claim is valid including, but not limited to, information on the duration and type of leave requested and granted, the stated reason for requested leave, and the amount of leave available to the employee after leave has been granted;(b) Determine if current program integrity measures, including any fraud protection, program misuse detection, coverage eligibility verification standards, and enforcement mechanisms to deny fraudulent claims are the most effective and efficient available; and(c) Make recommendations regarding:(i) Improvements to program integrity measures including, but not limited to, changes to benefit application forms, coverage eligibility verification standards, and enhanced enforcement mechanisms to deny fraudulent claims;(ii) Improvements to the department's benefit recovery methods;(iii) Improvements to department communications and reports to employers and employees that promote program integrity and the ability to determine whether a claim is valid; and(iv) Any legislative or administrative changes necessary to implement the recommendations.(3) The state auditor shall submit progress reports by December 1, 2026, and June 30, 2027, and the results of the audit by December 1, 2027, to the appropriate committees of the legislature.(4) This section expires December 31, 2027.--- END ---